Utah statutes.
13-34-102.   Legislative intent.

It is the policy of this state to do the following:

(1)  encourage private postsecondary education and training;

(2)  assure and protect the integrity of certificates and diplomas conferred by proprietary postsecondary educational institutions;

(3)  protect students and potential students from deceptively promoted, inadequately staffed, and unqualified proprietary institutions and programs; and

(4)  avoid unnecessary interference by the division with the internal academic policies and management practices of postsecondary educational institutions, but to facilitate disclosure of those matters to students and the public.



Enacted by Chapter 222, 2002 General Session

